Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-301
Counties containing city of first class; comprehensive development plan; encouraged to prepare; enforcement.

Since counties containing larger municipalities are typically experiencing population and economic growth which promotes increased urban and rural land-use conflicts, the county government of a county that contains some or all portions of a city of the first class is strongly encouraged to prepare a comprehensive development plan that meets the requirements of section 23-114.02, adopt zoning and subdivision regulations covering all portions of its regulatory jurisdiction, and begin an organized and staffed program to enforce such zoning and subdivision regulations.

Laws 1975, LB 317, § 2;

Laws 1978, LB 186, § 13;

Laws 1979, LB 412, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-152;

Laws 1985, LB 421, § 3.